Kansas, session 2025-2026, SB45.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
New Section 1. For purposes of accreditation by the state board,
the four-year adjusted cohort graduation rate for each school district
and any schools operated by such school district, including any virtual
school, shall be determined by excluding any student who:
(a) Had not earned sufficient credits to be expected to graduate in
the same school year as such student's cohort at the time that such
student transferred to and enrolled in such school or school district; or
(b) was enrolled in such school or school district but subsequently
transferred to a nonaccredited private school in Kansas or another state.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 72-3713 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 72-3713. (a) Virtual schools shall be under the general
supervision of the state board. The state board may adopt any rules and
regulations relating to virtual schools that the state board deems
necessary to administer and enforce the virtual school act.
(b) For purposes of accreditation by the state board, the four-year
adjusted cohort graduation rate for a virtual school shall be determined
by only including those students enrolled in such virtual school who
had earned sufficient credits to be expected to graduate in the same
school year as such student's cohort at the time such student first
enrolled in such virtual school. The virtual school's four-year adjusted
cohort graduation rate shall be determined in addition to the graduation
rates determined for the school district that operates the virtual school
and any other high schools operated by the school district.
(c) No virtual school shall offer or provide any financial incentive
for a student to enroll in a virtual school.
(d)(c) As used in this section, "financial incentive" means any
monetary payment or award that is intended to encourage, entice or
motivate a student to enroll in a virtual school.
Sec. 3. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 72-3713 is hereby repealed.

Substitute for SENATE BILL No. 45—page 2
Sec. 4. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.
I hereby certify that the above BILL originated in the
SENATE, and passed that body
__________________________
SENATE adopted
________________
Conference Committee Report
_________________________
President of the Senate.
_________________________
Secretary of the Senate.
Passed the HOUSE
_________________________
as amended
HOUSE adopted
________________
Conference Committee Report
_________________________
Speaker of the House.
_________________________
Chief Clerk of the House.
_____________________________
APPROVED
_________________________
Governor.